Utah statutes.
10-2-412.   Boundary commission authority -- Expenses -- Records.
(1)  The boundary commission for each county shall hear and decide, according
to the provisions of this part, each protest filed under Section 10-2-407,
with respect to an area that is located within that county.
(2)  A boundary commission may:
(a)  adopt and enforce rules of procedure for the orderly and fair conduct of
its proceedings;
(b)  authorize a member of the commission to administer oaths if necessary in
the performance of the commission's duties;
(c)  employ staff personnel and professional or consulting services reasonably
necessary to enable the commission to carry out its duties; and
(d)  incur reasonable and necessary expenses to enable the commission to carry
out its duties.
(3)  The legislative body of each county shall, with respect to the boundary
commission in that county:
(a)  furnish the commission necessary quarters, equipment, and supplies;
(b)  pay necessary operating expenses incurred by the commission; and
(c)  reimburse the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by each member
appointed under Subsection 10-2-409(2)(a)(iii) or (b)(iii), unless otherwise
provided by interlocal agreement.
(4)  Each county or municipal legislative body shall reimburse the reasonable
and necessary expenses incurred by a commission member who is an elected
county or municipal officer, respectively.
(5)  Records, information, and other relevant materials necessary to enable
the commission to carry out its duties shall, upon request by the commission,
be furnished to the boundary commission by the personnel, employees, and
officers of:
(a)  for a proposed annexation of an area located in a county of the first
class:
(i)  each county, local district, and special service district whose
boundaries include an area that is the subject of a protest under the
commission's consideration; and
(ii)  each municipality whose boundaries may be affected by action of the
boundary commission; or
(b)  for a proposed annexation of an area located in a specified county, each
affected entity:
(i)  whose boundaries include any part of the area proposed for annexation; or
(ii)  that may be affected by action of the boundary commission.
